scrapedcsv2yaml/yaml_output/VTA_aw.yaml
     abaagamizamaw+VTA+Ind+Pos+Neu+1Sg+3Sg: nindabaagamizamawaa
     abaagamizamaw+VTA+Ind+Pos+Neu+3Sg+3SgObv: odabaagamizamawaan
     abaagamizamaw+VTA+Cnj+Pos+Neu+3Sg+3SgObv: abaagamizamawaad
     abaagamizamaw+VTA+?+Pos+Neu+3Sg+3SgObv: ebaagamizamawaad
     abaagamizamaw+VTA+Imp+Pos+Neu+2Sg+3: abaagamizamaw
     abizamaw+VTA+Ind+Pos+Neu+1Sg+3Sg: indabizamawaa
     abizamaw+VTA+Ind+Pos+Neu+1Sg+3Sg: nindabizamawaa
     abizamaw+VTA+Ind+Pos+Neu+1Sg+3Sg: nidabizamawaa
     abizamaw+VTA+Ind+Pos+Neu+3Sg+3SgObv: odabizamawaan
     abizamaw+VTA+Cnj+Pos+Neu+3Sg+3SgObv: abizamawaad
     abizamaw+VTA+?+Pos+Neu+3Sg+3SgObv: ebizamawaad
     abizamaw+VTA+?+Pos+Neu+2Sg+3: abizamaw
     abiitaw+VTA+Ind+Pos+Neu+1Sg+3Sg: indabiitawaa
     abiitaw+VTA+Ind+Pos+Neu+1Sg+3Sg: nindabiitawaa
     abiitaw+VTA+Ind+Pos+Neu+1Sg+3Sg: nidabiitawaa
     abiitaw+VTA+Ind+Pos+Neu+3Sg+3SgObv: odabiitawaan
     abiitaw+VTA+Cnj+Pos+Neu+3Sg+3SgObv: abiitawaad
     abiitaw+VTA+?+Pos+Neu+3Sg+3SgObv: ebiitawaad
     abiitaw+VTA+Imp+Pos+Neu+2Sg+3: abiitaw
     abwiikaw+VTA+Ind+Pos+Neu+1Sg+3Sg: nindabwiikawaa
     abwiikaw+VTA+Ind+Pos+Neu+3Sg+3SgObv: odabwiikawaan
     abwiikaw+VTA+Cnj+Pos+Neu+3Sg+3SgObv: abwiikawaad
     abwiikaw+VTA+?+Pos+Neu+3Sg+3SgObv: ebwiikawaad
     abwiikaw+VTA+Imp+Pos+Neu+2Sg+3: abwiikaw
     adaawaagetamaw+VTA+Ind+Pos+Neu+1Sg+3Sg: indadaawaagetamawaa
     adaawaagetamaw+VTA+Ind+Pos+Neu+1Sg+3Sg: indadaawaagetamowaa
     adaawaagetamaw+VTA+Ind+Pos+Neu+3Sg+3SgObv: odadaawaagetamawaan
     adaawaagetamaw+VTA+Ind+Pos+Neu+3Sg+3SgObv: odadaawaagetamowaan
     adaawaagetamaw+VTA+Cnj+Pos+Neu+3Sg+3SgObv: adaawaagetamawaad
     adaawaagetamaw+VTA+Cnj+Pos+Neu+3Sg+3SgObv: adaawaagetamowaad
     adaawaagetamaw+VTA+?+Pos+Neu+3Sg+3SgObv: edaawaagetamawaad
     adaawaagetamaw+VTA+?+Pos+Neu+3Sg+3SgObv: edaawaagetamowaad
     adaawaagetamaw+VTA+Imp+Pos+Neu+2Sg+3: adaawaagetamaw
     adaawetamaw+VTA+Ind+Pos+Neu+1Sg+3Sg: nindadaawetamawaa
     adaawetamaw+VTA+Ind+Pos+Neu+1Sg+3Sg: indadaawetamowaa
     adaawetamaw+VTA+Ind+Pos+Neu+3Sg+3SgObv: odadaawetamawaan
     adaawetamaw+VTA+Ind+Pos+Neu+3Sg+3SgObv: odadaawetamowaan
     adaawetamaw+VTA+Cnj+Pos+Neu+3Sg+3SgObv: adaawetamawaad
     adaawetamaw+VTA+Cnj+Pos+Neu+3Sg+3SgObv: adaawetamowaad
     adaawetamaw+VTA+?+Pos+Neu+3Sg+3SgObv: edaawetamawaad
     adaawetamaw+VTA+?+Pos+Neu+3Sg+3SgObv: edaawetamowaad
     adaawetamaw+VTA+Imp+Pos+Neu+2Sg+3: adaawetamaw
     adimanikaw+VTA+Ind+Pos+Neu+1Sg+3Sg: nindadimanikawaa
     adimanikaw+VTA+Ind+Pos+Neu+3Sg+3SgObv: odadimanikawaan
     adimanikaw+VTA+Cnj+Pos+Neu+3Sg+3SgObv: adimanikawaad
     adimanikaw+VTA+?+Pos+Neu+3Sg+3SgObv: edimanikawaad
     adisamaw+VTA+Ind+Pos+Neu+1Sg+3Sg: nindadisamawaa
     adisamaw+VTA+Ind+Pos+Neu+1Sg+3Sg: ndadismawaa
     adisamaw+VTA+Ind+Pos+Neu+3Sg+1Sg: nindadisamaag
     adisamaw+VTA+Ind+Pos+Neu+3Sg+3SgObv: odadisamawaan
     adisamaw+VTA+Cnj+Pos+Neu+3Sg+3SgObv: adisamawaad
     adisamaw+VTA+?+Pos+Neu+3Sg+3SgObv: edisamawaad
     adisamaw+VTA+Imp+Pos+Neu+2Sg+3: adisamaw
     agajiitaw+VTA+Ind+Pos+Neu+1Sg+3Sg: indagajiitawaa
     agajiitaw+VTA+Ind+Pos+Neu+1Sg+3Sg: nindagajiitawaa
     agajiitaw+VTA+Ind+Pos+Neu+1Sg+3Sg: nidagajiitawaa
     agajiitaw+VTA+Ind+Pos+Neu+3Sg+3SgObv: odagajiitawaan
     agajiitaw+VTA+Cnj+Pos+Neu+3Sg+3SgObv: agajiitawaad
     agajiitaw+VTA+?+Pos+Neu+3Sg+3SgObv: egajiitawaad
     agajiitaw+VTA+Imp+Pos+Neu+3Obv+3: agajiitaw
     agawaateshkaw+VTA+Ind+Pos+Neu+1Sg+3Sg: indagawaateshkawaa
     agawaateshkaw+VTA+Ind+Pos+Neu+1Sg+3Sg: nindagawaateshkawaa
     agawaateshkaw+VTA+Ind+Pos+Neu+1Sg+3Sg: nidagawaateshkawaa
     agawaateshkaw+VTA+Ind+Pos+Neu+3Sg+3SgObv: odagawaateshkawaan
     agawaateshkaw+VTA+Cnj+Pos+Neu+3Sg+3SgObv: agawaateshkawaad
     agawaateshkaw+VTA+?+Pos+Neu+3Sg+3SgObv: egawaateshkawaad
     agawaateshkaw+VTA+Imp+Pos+Neu+2Sg+3: agawaateshkaw
     agaamindekaw+VTA+Ind+Pos+Neu+1Sg+3Sg: nindagaamindekawaa
     agaamindekaw+VTA+Ind+Pos+Neu+3Sg+3SgObv: odagaamindekawaan
     agaamindekaw+VTA+Cnj+Pos+Neu+3Sg+3SgObv: agaamindekawaad
     agaamindekaw+VTA+?+Pos+Neu+3Sg+3SgObv: egaamindekawaad
     agaamindekaw+VTA+Imp+Pos+Neu+2Sg+3: agaamindekaw
     agindamaw+VTA+Ind+Pos+Neu+1Sg+3Sg: indagindamawaa
     agindamaw+VTA+Ind+Pos+Neu+1Sg+3Sg: nindagindamawaa
     agindamaw+VTA+Ind+Pos+Neu+1Sg+3Sg: nidagindamawaa
     agindamaw+VTA+Ind+Pos+Neu+3Sg+3SgObv: odagindamawaan
     agindamaw+VTA+Cnj+Pos+Neu+3Sg+3SgObv: agindamawaad
     agindamaw+VTA+?+Pos+Neu+3Sg+3SgObv: egindamawaad
     agindamaw+VTA+Imp+Pos+Neu+2Sg+3: agindamaw 
     agozideshkaw+VTA+Ind+Pos+Neu+1Sg+3Sg: nindagozideshkawaa
     agozideshkaw+VTA+Ind+Pos+Neu+3Sg+3SgObv: odagozideshkawaan
     agozideshkaw+VTA+Cnj+Pos+Neu+3Sg+3SgObv: agozideshkawaad
     agozideshkaw+VTA+?+Pos+Neu+3Sg+3SgObv: egozideshkawaad
     agozideshkaw+VTA+Imp+Pos+Neu+2Sg+3: agozideshkaw
     agoodamaw+VTA+Ind+Pos+Neu+1Sg+3Sg: indagoodamawaa
     agoodamaw+VTA+Ind+Pos+Neu+1Sg+3Sg: indagoodamowaa
     agoodamaw+VTA+Ind+Pos+Neu+3Sg+3SgObv: odagoodamawaan
     agoodamaw+VTA+Ind+Pos+Neu+3Sg+3SgObv: odagoodamowaan
     agoodamaw+VTA+Cnj+Pos+Neu+3Sg+3SgObv: agoodamawaad
     agoodamaw+VTA+Cnj+Pos+Neu+3Sg+3SgObv: agoodamowaad
     agoodamaw+VTA+?+Pos+Neu+3Sg+3SgObv: egoodamawaad
     agoodamaw+VTA+?+Pos+Neu+3Sg+3SgObv: egoodamowaad
     agoodamaw+VTA+Imp+Pos+Neu+2Sg+3: agoodamaw
     agoodaw+VTA+Ind+Pos+Neu+1Sg+3Sg: indagoodawaa
     agoodaw+VTA+Ind+Pos+Neu+1Sg+3Sg: nindagoodawaa
     agoodaw+VTA+Ind+Pos+Neu+1Sg+3Sg: nidagoodawaa
     agoodaw+VTA+Ind+Pos+Neu+3Sg+3SgObv: odagoodawaan
     agoodaw+VTA+Cnj+Pos+Neu+3Sg+3SgObv: agoodawaad
     agoodaw+VTA+?+Pos+Neu+3Sg+3SgObv: egoodawaad
     agoodaw+VTA+Imp+Pos+Neu+2Sg+3: agoodaw
     agwa'amaw+VTA+Ind+Pos+Neu+1Sg+3Sg: nindagwa'amawaa
     agwa'amaw+VTA+Ind+Pos+Neu+3Sg+3SgObv: odagwa'amawaan
     agwa'amaw+VTA+Cnj+Pos+Neu+3Sg+3SgObv: agwa'amawaad
     agwa'amaw+VTA+?+Pos+Neu+3Sg+3SgObv: egwa'amawaad
     agwa'amaw+VTA+Imp+Pos+Neu+2Sg+3: agwa'amaw
     agwana'amaw+VTA+Ind+Pos+Neu+1Sg+3Sg: indagwana'amawaa
     agwana'amaw+VTA+Ind+Pos+Neu+1Sg+3Sg: indagwana'amowaa
     agwana'amaw+VTA+Ind+Pos+Neu+3Sg+3SgObv: odagwana'amawaan
     agwana'amaw+VTA+Ind+Pos+Neu+3Sg+3SgObv: odagwana'amowaan
     agwana'amaw+VTA+Cnj+Pos+Neu+3Sg+3SgObv: agwana'amawaad
     agwana'amaw+VTA+Cnj+Pos+Neu+3Sg+3SgObv: agwana'amowaad
     agwana'amaw+VTA+?+Pos+Neu+3Sg+3SgObv: egwana'amawaad
     agwana'amaw+VTA+?+Pos+Neu+3Sg+3SgObv: egwana'amowaad
     agwana'amaw+VTA+Imp+Pos+Neu+2Sg+3: agwana'amaw
     agwaabiiga'amaw+VTA+Ind+Pos+Neu+1Sg+3Sg: indagwaabiiga'amawaa
     agwaabiiga'amaw+VTA+Ind+Pos+Neu+1Sg+3Sg: nindagwaabiiga'amawaa
     agwaabiiga'amaw+VTA+Ind+Pos+Neu+1Sg+3Sg: nidagwaabiiga'amawaa
     agwaabiiga'amaw+VTA+Ind+Pos+Neu+3Sg+3SgObv: odagwaabiiga'amawaan
     agwaabiiga'amaw+VTA+Cnj+Pos+Neu+3Sg+3SgObv: agwaabiiga'amawaad
     agwaabiiga'amaw+VTA+?+Pos+Neu+3Sg+3SgObv: egwaabiiga'amawaad
     agwaabiiga'amaw+VTA+Imp+Pos+Neu+3Obv+3: agwaabiiga'amaw
     agwaa'amaw+VTA+Ind+Pos+Neu+1Sg+3Sg: nindagwaa'amawaa
     agwaa'amaw+VTA+Ind+Pos+Neu+3Sg+1Sg: nindagwaa'amaag
     agwaa'amaw+VTA+Ind+Pos+Neu+1Sg+2Sg: gidagwaa'amawin
     agwaa'amaw+VTA+Ind+Pos+Neu+2Sg+1Sg: gidagwaa'amaw
     agwaa'amaw+VTA+Ind+Pos+Neu+3Sg+3SgObv: odagwaa'amawaan
     agwaa'amaw+VTA+Cnj+Pos+Neu+3Sg+3SgObv: agwaa'amawaad
     agwaa'amaw+VTA+?+Pos+Neu+3Sg+3SgObv: egwaa'amawaad
     agwaa'amaw+VTA+Imp+Pos+Neu+2Sg+1Sg: agwaa'amawishin
     agwaanizhikaw+VTA+Ind+Pos+Neu+1Sg+3Sg: indagwaanizhikawaa
     agwaanizhikaw+VTA+Ind+Pos+Neu+3Sg+3SgObv: odagwaanizhikawaan
     agwaanizhikaw+VTA+Cnj+Pos+Neu+3Sg+3SgObv: agwaanizhikawaad
     agwaanizhikaw+VTA+?+Pos+Neu+3Sg+3SgObv: egwaanizhikawaad
     agwaanizhikaw+VTA+Imp+Pos+Neu+2Sg+3: agwaanizhikaw
     agwaawebinamaw+VTA+Ind+Pos+Neu+1Sg+3Sg: indagwaawebinamawaa
     agwaawebinamaw+VTA+Ind+Pos+Neu+1Sg+3Sg: nindagwaawebinamawaa
     agwaawebinamaw+VTA+Ind+Pos+Neu+1Sg+3Sg: nidagwaawebinamawaa
     agwaawebinamaw+VTA+Ind+Pos+Neu+3Sg+3SgObv: odagwaawebinamawaan
     agwaawebinamaw+VTA+Cnj+Pos+Neu+3Sg+3SgObv: agwaawebinamawaad
     agwaawebinamaw+VTA+?+Pos+Neu+3Sg+3SgObv: egwaawebinamawaad
     agwaawebinamaw+VTA+Imp+Pos+Neu+2Sg+3: agwaawebinamaw
     akamaw+VTA+Ind+Pos+Neu+1Sg+3Sg: indakamawaa
     akamaw+VTA+Ind+Pos+Neu+1Sg+3Sg: nindakamawaa
     akamaw+VTA+Ind+Pos+Neu+1Sg+3Sg: nidakamawaa
     akamaw+VTA+Ind+Pos+Neu+3Sg+3SgObv: odakamawaan
     akamaw+VTA+Cnj+Pos+Neu+3Sg+3SgObv: akamawaad
     akamaw+VTA+?+Pos+Neu+3Sg+3SgObv: ekamawaad
     akamaw+VTA+Imp+Pos+Neu+2Sg+0: akamaw 
     akwaandawenizhikaw+VTA+Ind+Pos+Neu+1Sg+3Sg: indakwaandawenizhikawaa
     akwaandawenizhikaw+VTA+Ind+Pos+Neu+3Sg+3SgObv: odakwaandawenizhikawaan
     akwaandawenizhikaw+VTA+Cnj+Pos+Neu+3Sg+3SgObv: akwaandawenizhikawaad
     akwaandawenizhikaw+VTA+?+Pos+Neu+3Sg+3SgObv: ekwaandawenizhikawaad
     akwaandawenizhikaw+VTA+Imp+Pos+Neu+2Sg+3: akwaandawenizhikaw
     amanisodaw+VTA+Ind+Pos+Neu+1Sg+3Sg: indamanisodawaa
     amanisodaw+VTA+Ind+Pos+Neu+1Sg+3Sg: nindamanisodawaa
     amanisodaw+VTA+Ind+Pos+Neu+1Sg+3Sg: nidamanisodawaa
     amanisodaw+VTA+Ind+Pos+Neu+3Sg+3SgObv: odamanisodawaan
     amanisodaw+VTA+Cnj+Pos+Neu+3Sg+3SgObv: amanisodawaad
     amanisodaw+VTA+?+Pos+Neu+3Sg+3SgObv: emanisodawaad
     amanisodaw+VTA+Imp+Pos+Neu+2Sg+3: amanisodaw 
     anama'etaw+VTA+Ind+Pos+Neu+1Sg+3Sg: indanama'etawaa
     anama'etaw+VTA+Ind+Pos+Neu+1Sg+3Sg: nindanama'etawaa
     anama'etaw+VTA+Ind+Pos+Neu+1Sg+3Sg: nidanama'etawaa
     anama'etaw+VTA+Ind+Pos+Neu+3Sg+3SgObv: odanama'etawaan
     anama'etaw+VTA+Cnj+Pos+Neu+3Sg+3SgObv: anama'etawaad
     anama'etaw+VTA+?+Pos+Neu+3Sg+3SgObv: enama'etawaad
     anama'etaw+VTA+?+Pos+Neu+2Sg+3: anama'etaw 
     anamikaw+VTA+Ind+Pos+Neu+1Sg+3Sg: indanamikawaa
     anamikaw+VTA+Ind+Pos+Neu+1Sg+3Sg: nindanamikawaa
     anamikaw+VTA+Ind+Pos+Neu+1Sg+3Sg: nidanamikawaa
     anamikaw+VTA+Ind+Pos+Neu+3Sg+3SgObv: odanamikawaan
     anamikaw+VTA+Cnj+Pos+Neu+3Sg+3SgObv: anamikawaad
     anamikaw+VTA+?+Pos+Neu+3Sg+3SgObv: enamikawaad
     anamikaw+VTA+Imp+Pos+Neu+2Sg+3: anamikaw
     andodamaw+VTA+Ind+Pos+Neu+1Sg+3Sg: ninandodamawaa
     andodamaw+VTA+Cnj+Pos+Neu+3Sg+3SgObv: andodamawaad
     andodamaw+VTA+Imp+Pos+Neu+2Sg+3: andodamaw
     andonizhikaw+VTA+Ind+Pos+Neu+1Sg+3Sg: ninandonizhikawaa
     andonizhikaw+VTA+Ind+Pos+Neu+3Sg+3SgObv: onandonizhikawaan
     andonizhikaw+VTA+Cnj+Pos+Neu+3Sg+3SgObv: andonizhikawaad
     andonizhikaw+VTA+?+Pos+Neu+3Sg+3SgObv: endonizhikawaad
     andonizhikaw+VTA+Imp+Pos+Neu+2Sg+3: andonizhikaw
     andotaw+VTA+Ind+Pos+Neu+1Sg+3Sg: ninandotawaa
     andotaw+VTA+Ind+Pos+Neu+3Pl+3SgObv: onandotawaan
     andotaw+VTA+Cnj+Pos+Neu+3Sg+3SgObv: andotawaad
     andotaw+VTA+?+Pos+Neu+3Sg+3SgObv: endootawaad
     andotaw+VTA+Imp+Pos+Neu+2Sg+3: andotaw
     andoojiishkaw+VTA+Ind+Pos+Neu+1Sg+3Sg: ninandoojiishkawaa
     andoojiishkaw+VTA+Ind+Pos+Neu+3Sg+3SgObv: onandoojiishkawaan
     andoojiishkaw+VTA+Cnj+Pos+Neu+?+3SgObv: andoojiishkawaad
     andoojiishkaw+VTA+?+Pos+Neu+3Sg+3SgObv: endoojiishkawaad
     andoojiishkaw+VTA+Imp+Pos+Neu+2Sg+3: andoojiishkaw
     angoshkaw+VTA+Ind+Pos+Neu+1Sg+3Sg: indangoshkawaa
     angoshkaw+VTA+Ind+Pos+Neu+1Sg+3Sg: nindangoshkawaa
     angoshkaw+VTA+Ind+Pos+Neu+1Sg+3Sg: nidangoshkawaa
     angoshkaw+VTA+Ind+Pos+Neu+3Sg+3SgObv: odangoshkawaan
     angoshkaw+VTA+Cnj+Pos+Neu+3Sg+3SgObv: angoshkawaad
     angoshkaw+VTA+?+Pos+Neu+3Sg+3SgObv: engoshkawaad
     angoshkaw+VTA+Imp+Pos+Neu+2Sg+3: angoshkaw 
     anibewebishkaw+VTA+Ind+Pos+Neu+1Sg+3Sg: indanibewebishkawaa
     anibewebishkaw+VTA+Ind+Pos+Neu+3Sg+3SgObv: odanibewebishkawaan
     anibewebishkaw+VTA+Cnj+Pos+Neu+3Sg+3SgObv: anibewebishkawaad
     anibewebishkaw+VTA+?+Pos+Neu+3Sg+3SgObv: enibewebishkawaad
     anibewebishkaw+VTA+Imp+Pos+Neu+2Sg+3: anibewebishkaw
     animikogaabawitaw+VTA+Ind+Pos+Neu+1Sg+3Sg: indanimikogaabawitawaa
     animikogaabawitaw+VTA+Ind+Pos+Neu+3Sg+3SgObv: odanimikogaabawitawaan
     animikogaabawitaw+VTA+Cnj+Pos+Neu+3Sg+3SgObv: animikogaabawitawaad
